Hawaii statutes.
§226-7 Objectives and policies for the
economy--agriculture. (a) Planning for the State's economy with regard to
agriculture shall be directed towards achievement of the following objectives:

(1) Viability of Hawaii's sugar and pineapple
industries.

(2) Growth and development of diversified agriculture
throughout the State.

(3) An agriculture industry that continues to
constitute a dynamic and essential component of Hawaii's strategic, economic,
and social well-being.

(b) To achieve the agriculture objectives, it
shall be the policy of this State to:

(1) Establish a clear direction for Hawaii's
agriculture through stakeholder commitment and advocacy.

(2) Encourage agriculture by making the best use of
natural resources.

(3) Provide the governor and the legislature with
information and options needed for prudent decision-making for the development
of agriculture.

(4) Establish strong relationships between the
agricultural and visitor industries for mutual marketing benefits.

(5) Foster increased public awareness and
understanding of the contributions and benefits of agriculture as a major
sector of Hawaii's economy.

(6) Seek the enactment and retention of federal and
state legislation that benefits Hawaii's agricultural industries.

(7) Strengthen diversified agriculture by developing
an effective promotion, marketing, and distribution system between Hawaii's
food producers and consumers in the State, nation, and world.

(8) Support research and development activities that
strengthen economic productivity in agriculture, stimulate greater efficiency,
and enhance the development of new products and agricultural by-products.

(9) Enhance agricultural growth by providing public
incentives and encouraging private initiatives.

(10) Assure the availability of agriculturally
suitable lands with adequate water to accommodate present and future needs.

(11) Increase the attractiveness and opportunities for
an agricultural education and livelihood.

(12) In addition to the State's priority on food,
expand Hawaii's agricultural base by promoting growth and development of
flowers, tropical fruits and plants, livestock, feed grains, forestry, food
crops, aquaculture, and other potential enterprises.

(13) Promote economically competitive activities that
increase Hawaii's agricultural self-sufficiency, including the increased
purchase and use of Hawaii-grown food and food products by residents,
businesses, and governmental bodies as defined under section 103D‑104.

(14) Promote and assist in the establishment of sound
financial programs for diversified agriculture.

(15) Institute and support programs and activities to
assist the entry of displaced agricultural workers into alternative
agricultural or other employment.

(16) Facilitate the transition of agricultural lands
in economically nonfeasible agricultural production to economically viable
agricultural uses.

(17) Perpetuate, promote,
and increase use of traditional Hawaiian farming systems, such as the
use of loko i‘a, māla, and irrigated lo‘i, and growth of traditional Hawaiian crops, such
as kalo, ‘uala, and ‘ulu.

(18) Increase and develop small-scale farms. [L 1978,
c 100, pt of §2; am L 1986, c 276, §6; am L 1993, c 25, §2; am L 2009, c 167,
§3; am L 2013, c 55, §2; am L 2015, c 31, §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next